Colorado, session 2026A, HB1204.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-4-203, amend
(12); and add (6.5), (6.7), (13.5), and (16) as follows:
29-4-203. Definitions.
As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:
(6.5) "COOPERATIVE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
38-33.3-103 (10).
(6.7) "COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION" MEANS A
COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION
38-33.5-101.
(12) "Project" means all real and personal property, buildings and
improvements, stores, offices, lands for farming and gardening,
commercial facilities, and community facilities acquired or constructed
or to be acquired or constructed pursuant to a single plan or undertaking
to demolish, clear, remove, alter, or repair unsanitary or unsafe housing
or to provide dwelling accommodations on financial terms within the
means of persons of low income. The term "project" also applies to the
planning of the buildings and improvements, the acquisition of property,
-2- HB26-1204

the demolition of existing structures, the construction, reconstruction,
alteration, and repair of the improvements and all other work in
connection therewith. The term "project" also applies to the provision of
dwelling accommodations to persons, without regard to income, as long
as the project substantially benefits persons of low income as determined
by an authority. THE TERM "PROJECT" INCLUDES A SENIOR COOPERATIVE
HOUSING PROJECT.
(13.5) "SENIOR COOPERATIVE HOUSING PROJECT" MEANS A
MULTI-UNIT RESIDENTIAL BUILDING OR COMPLEX OCCUPIED BY
QUALIFYING SENIORS THAT IS OWNED, IN PART OR IN WHOLE, BY A
COOPERATIVE OR COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION.
(16) "QUALIFYING SENIOR" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS AT
LEAST SIXTY-FIVE YEARS OLD AND OF LOW INCOME.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-4-1103, add
(1.5)(c) and (9) as follows:
29-4-1103. Definitions.
As used in this part 11, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1.5) (c) AN "AFFORDABLE RENTAL HOUSING PROJECT" MAY
INCLUDE A SENIOR COOPERATIVE HOUSING PROJECT IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (1.5)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(9) "SENIOR COOPERATIVE HOUSING PROJECT" HAS THE MEANING
SET FORTH IN SECTION 29-4-203 (13.5); EXCEPT THAT FOR THE PURPOSES
OF THIS PART 11, A QUALIFYING SENIOR INCLUDES AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
AT LEAST SIXTY-FIVE YEARS OLD AND OF LOW OR MIDDLE INCOME.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
-3- HB26-1204

12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-4- HB26-1204